Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3561.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.553, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Discharge firearm; kill animal. new text begin (a) new text end Whenever a peace officer discharges a firearm in the course of duty, other than for training purposes or the killing of an animal that is sick, injured, or dangerous, notification shall be filed within 30 days of the incident by the officer's department head with the commissioner of public safety. The commissioner of public safety shall forward a copy of the filing to the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training. The notification shall contain information concerning the reason for and circumstances surrounding discharge of the firearm. The commissioner of public safety shall file a report with the legislature by November 15 of each even-numbered year containing summary information concerning use of firearms by peace officers. new text begin (b) If the discharge under paragraph (a) is accidental or due to the officer's negligence, the notification to the commissioner and the Peace Officer Standards and Training Board and subsequent report to the legislature must include the make, model, and caliber of the firearm, and information on any of the firearm's accessories, including but not limited to lights, lasers, and holsters. The required information on accessories must specify whether the accessory was part of the manufacturing process or was an after-market addition. This paragraph expires August 1, 2031. new text end